test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-sarves_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



  Noun - sarves: # -kontrakta utan stv
    sarves+N+Sg+Nom: [sarves, sarrvá]
    sarves+N+Sg+Gen: sarrvá
    sarves+N+Sg+Acc: sarrváv
    sarves+N+Sg+Ill: sarrváj
    sarves+N+Sg+Ine: sarrván
    sarves+N+Sg+Ela: sarrvást
    sarves+N+Sg+Com: sarrvájn
    sarves+N+Pl+Nom: sarrvá
    sarves+N+Pl+Gen: sarrváj
    sarves+N+Pl+Acc: sarrvájd
    sarves+N+Pl+Ill: sarrvájda
    sarves+N+Pl+Ine: sarrvájn
    sarves+N+Pl+Ela: sarrvájst
    sarves+N+Pl+Com: sarrváj
    sarves+N+Ess: sarrván
    sarves+N+Abe: sarrvádak


#JW: why is this here?
#  Noun - vanas: # Korttest: -udda med stv men utan vokalv
#    vanas+N+Sg+Nom: vanas
#    vanas+N+Sg+Gen: vadnasa
#    vanas+N+Sg+Ill: vadnasij
#    vanas+N+Pl+Gen: vadnasij
